Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201618-2709.01
Workforce housing plan, defined.

Workforce housing plan means a program to construct or rehabilitate single-family housing or market rate multi-family housing which is designed to address a housing shortage that impairs the ability of the city to attract new businesses or impairs the ability of existing businesses to recruit new employees.

Laws 2016, LB1059, § 5.